Utah statutes.
73-27-104.   Compensation and expenses of commission members.

Legislators on the commission shall receive compensation and expenses as provided in Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rule 15.03.  Commission members who are employees of the state shall receive no additional compensation.  Other commission members shall receive no compensation or expenses for their service on the commission.

